Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 8.7
LOW-INCOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE

Section

40-8.7-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Low-income Energy Assistance Act".

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 478, § 1, effective May 5.

40-8.7-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that, in order to serve the best interests of the citizens of Colorado and, in particular, to aid low-income citizens of Colorado, there is a need for an energy assistance program to collect an optional low-income energy assistance contribution from utility customers in Colorado.

The general assembly further finds that the most efficient way to support such a program is for gas and electric utilities to provide the opportunity for each utility customer to contribute an optional amount on the customer's billing statement for low-income energy assistance that will be displayed monthly on the utility bill until the customer indicates otherwise and that the moneys collected shall be most economically and equitably disbursed through a system in which the contributions collected by electric utilities and gas utilities are transmitted to energy outreach Colorado.

The general assembly further finds that, although municipal and special district water utilities are not regulated by the public utilities commission, allowing all water utilities to participate in a water assistance program on a voluntary basis will provide an efficient means for some water utilities to provide financial assistance to their customers in low-income households.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 478, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2021:

(3) added, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3499, § 6, effective September 7.

40-8.7-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 8.7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Alternative energy assistance program" means a program operated by a municipally owned electric and gas utility or cooperative electric association that is not part of the energy assistance program established pursuant to this article.

"Customer" means the named holder of an individually metered account upon which charges for electricity, gas, or water are paid to a utility or water utility. "Customer" does not include a customer that receives electricity or gas for the sole purpose of reselling the electricity or gas to others.

"Energy assistance program" or "program" means the low-income energy assistance program created by section 40-8.7-104 and designed to provide financial assistance, residential energy efficiency, and energy conservation assistance.

(3.3) "Energy assistance system benefit charge" or "charge" means the charge that investor-owned utilities doing business in Colorado collect from their customers on a monthly basis pursuant to section 40-8.7-104 (2.5).

"Organization" means energy outreach Colorado, a Colorado nonprofit corporation, formerly known as the Colorado energy assistance foundation.

(4.7) "Public utilities commission" or "commission" means the public utilities commission created in section 40-2-101.

"Remittance device" means the section of a customer's utility billing statement that is returned to the utility company for payment.

"Utility" means a corporation, association, partnership, cooperative electric association, or municipally owned entity that provides retail electric service or retail gas service to customers in Colorado. "Utility" does not mean a propane company.

"Water utility" means a water corporation or municipal water provider that provides retail water or wastewater service to customers in Colorado.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 479, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1509, § 61, effective June 1.

L. 2021:

IP and (2) amended and (3.3), (4.7), and (7) added, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3499, § 7, effective September 7.

40-8.7-104. Energy assistance program - creation - energy assistance contribution - energy assistance system benefit charge.

There is hereby created the low-income energy assistance program to collect and disburse an optional energy assistance contribution and an energy assistance system benefit charge in Colorado in accordance with this article 8.7.

Except as otherwise provided in this article 8.7, every utility doing business in Colorado shall participate in the energy assistance program and provide the opportunity for utility customers to make an optional energy assistance contribution on the monthly remittance device on their utility billing statement. Each utility shall provide the opportunity for customers to donate the optional energy assistance contribution as provided in section 40-8.7-105 (2).

(2.5) (a) Except as provided in subsections (2.5)(b) and (2.5)(c) of this section, commencing with a customer's billing statement covering electric or gas usage in the month of October 2021, every investor-owned utility doing business in Colorado shall collect a monthly energy assistance system benefit charge from each of its utility customers pursuant to section 40-8.7-105.5 (1).

For each month that an investor-owned utility collects the monthly energy assistance system benefit charge, the utility shall include on its customers' billing statements a conspicuous notification in both English and Spanish that substantially complies with the following language:

The organization shall notify each investor-owned utility of any customer of the investor-owned utility who is exempted from payment of the charge by virtue of having received direct utility bill payment assistance from the organization in the previous twelve months.

Each investor-owned utility shall review readily available information it has received from the state department of human services and the organization to determine which customers have received any direct utility bill payment assistance from the state department or the organization in the previous twelve months and, as a result, are eligible for exemption from payment of the charge.

Upon receiving notification from the organization pursuant to subsection (2.5)(b)(II) of this section or upon its own determination that a customer is eligible for exemption from the charge, an investor-owned utility shall remove the charge from the customer's monthly billing statements for the succeeding twelve months.

For each month that an investor-owned utility collects the monthly energy assistance system benefit charge, the utility shall include on its customers' billing statements within its explanation of charges a phone number or e-mail address through which a customer may opt out of paying the monthly energy assistance system benefit charge.

Any reasonable costs that a utility incurs in connection with the program, including the initial costs of setting up the collection mechanism and reformatting its billing systems to solicit the optional contribution and to impose and collect the charge, shall be reimbursed from the money collected for the program. The utility must submit a calculation of the amount of money to be reimbursed to the public utilities commission for its approval of prudently incurred costs. The reimbursed amounts must be transmitted to the utilities before the remaining money is distributed to the organization.

If you're struggling to pay your utility bills, you might qualify for exemption from a monthly charge related to energy assistance and be eligible for utility bill payment assistance. Please call 1-866-HEAT-HELP to see if you qualify.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 479, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3499, § 8, effective September 7.

40-8.7-104.3. Water assistance program - creation - water assistance contribution.

On and after September 7, 2021, a water utility doing business in Colorado may participate in a water assistance program created and managed by the organization to provide water utility bill payment assistance to low-income households. A water utility's voluntary participation in the water assistance program will provide a water utility customer with an opportunity to make an optional contribution on the customer's monthly or quarterly remittance device on the water utility billing statement.

A water utility participating in the water assistance program shall provide the opportunity for its customers to donate the contribution described in subsection (1)(a) of this section in accordance with the check-off mechanism set forth in section 40-8.7-105 (2).

Section 40-8.7-105 (1), (3), (4), and (5) does not apply to a water utility's participation in the water assistance program.

A water utility may create its own water assistance program to meet its customers' water assistance needs. In determining eligibility for assistance, a water utility may adopt the criteria specified in section 40-3-106 (1)(d) or alternative criteria as determined by the water utility.

A water utility participating in the organization's water assistance program pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or creating its own water assistance program pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may seek reimbursement for any reasonable costs that it incurs in connection with the program, including initial costs of setting up the collection mechanism and reformatting its billing systems to solicit an optional contribution.

The organization shall use the money collected from each water utility pursuant to this section to help finance direct water utility bill payment assistance to low-income households served by that water utility.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3501, § 9, effective September 7.

40-8.7-105. Customer opt-in provision.

The public utilities commission shall determine the mechanism for an opt-in provision whereby the energy assistance contributions described in section 40-8.7-104 will be collected from those customers who give notice of their intent to participate in the energy assistance program.

Each utility shall solicit voluntary donations through a check-off mechanism displayed on the monthly remittance device. Recommended check-off categories of five dollars, ten dollars, twenty dollars, and "other amount" shall be displayed.

Once a customer voluntarily opts into the program, the appropriate contribution shall be assessed on a monthly basis until the customer notifies the utility of his or her desire to remove the contribution. Each utility shall establish procedures to notify customers about their ability to cancel any voluntary contribution.

Once the utility customer opts into the program, the energy assistance contribution shall appear as a separate line item and shall be identified in the billing statement as a contribution. The line item shall identify the optional low-income contribution, state the amount of the optional contribution, and be included in the total amount due.

In accordance with article 4 of title 24 C.R.S., on or before November 1, 2005, the public utilities commission shall initiate at least one rule-making proceeding to accomplish the following:

Establish a program whereby customers will be solicited to contribute a flat amount on the monthly remittance device on the utility billing statement;

Encourage each utility to provide notification, where feasible, to customers participating in the program about the customer's ability to continue to contribute when the customer changes his or her address within the service territory;

Require the utility to make additional efforts to inform utility customers about the program to ensure that adequate notice of the opt-in provision is given to all customers;

In addition to notification on the monthly remittance device on the billing statement, require each utility to notify its customers about the opt-in provision prior to September 1, 2006, and require each utility to provide clear, periodic notice of the opt-in provision at least twice per year through bill inserts, in a statement on the bill or envelope, or in other utility communication pieces or through an alternative method approved by the commission. The costs of the insert and any other notification efforts will be considered in the utility's cost of service.

Require each utility to consider the most cost-effective method possible when implementing the program; and

Ensure that there is a mechanism for customers who make electronic payments to the utility to remove the optional charge from their monthly payments.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 480, § 1, effective May 5.

40-8.7-105.5. Energy assistance system benefit charge - repeal.

On and after October 1, 2021, and except as provided in section 40-8.7-104 (2.5)(b), each investor-owned energy utility shall include on its customers' monthly bills a flat energy assistance system benefit charge that a customer is assessed to help finance the low-income energy assistance program.

Except as provided in subsections (1)(b)(II) and (1)(b)(III) of this section, the monthly energy assistance system benefit charge is seventy-five cents for electric service provided and seventy-five cents for natural gas service provided.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section, for billing statements covering electric or natural gas usage between the months of October 2021 and September 2022, the monthly energy assistance system benefit charge is reduced to fifty cents for electric service provided and fifty cents for natural gas service provided.

This subsection (1)(b)(II) is repealed, effective September 1, 2023.

Commencing October 1, 2023, the monthly energy assistance system benefit charge shall be adjusted in accordance with changes in the United States department of labor's bureau of labor statistics consumer price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban consumers, or its successor index.

Each investor-owned utility shall use the most cost-effective method for implementing the program.

This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2029.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3502, § 10, effective September 7.

40-8.7-106. Municipally owned gas, electric, and gas and electric utilities and cooperative electric associations.

If a municipally owned gas, electric, or gas and electric utility or a cooperative electric association operates an alternative energy assistance program to support its low-income customers with their home energy needs, then the governing body of the municipally owned gas, electric, or gas and electric utility or cooperative electric association may self-certify its alternative energy assistance program and, upon self-certification, shall have no obligations under this article. The municipally owned utility or cooperative electric association shall submit a statement to the organization that such utility or cooperative electric association has an alternative energy assistance program. In order for such utility or cooperative electric association to self-certify, such alternative energy assistance program shall meet the following criteria:

The amount and method for funding of the program shall be determined by the governing body.

Program moneys shall be collected and distributed in a manner and under eligibility criteria determined by the governing body for the purpose of residential energy assistance to customers who are challenged with paying energy bills for financial reasons, including to seniors on fixed incomes, individuals with disabilities, and low-income individuals.

If the governing body of a municipally owned gas, electric, or gas and electric utility or a cooperative electric association determines that the service area of such utility or cooperative has a limited number of people who qualify for energy assistance, such utility or cooperative electric association may be exempt from the obligations of this article.

If a municipally owned gas, electric, or gas and electric utility or cooperative electric association has not self-certified an alternative energy assistance program pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or has not exempted itself pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, such utility or cooperative electric association shall collect an optional energy assistance charge from its customers as provided in section 40-8.7-104 (1) and (2) or pursuant to a procedure approved by the governing municipal utility or cooperative, which procedure shall be designed to notify all customers at least twice each year of the option to contribute by means of a monthly energy assistance charge and shall provide a convenient means for customers to exercise that option. In such circumstances, the governing body of such utility or cooperative shall determine the disposition and delivery of the optional energy assistance charge that it collects on the following basis:

The governing body may elect to deliver the optional charge that it collects to the organization for distribution in accordance with this article.

If the governing body does not make such election pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the energy assistance moneys collected shall be distributed under eligibility criteria determined by the governing body for the purpose set forth in paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section.

A municipally owned gas, electric, or gas and electric utility or cooperative electric association may provide funding for energy assistance to the organization by using a source of funding other than the optional customer contribution on each bill. If the amount of such assistance approximates the amount reasonably expected to be collected from an optional charge on customer bills, a municipal utility or cooperative need not certify its own program pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and need not collect an optional energy assistance charge but shall be entitled to participate in the organization's program.

Any reasonable costs that a municipally owned gas, electric, or gas and electric utility or cooperative electric association incurs in connection with the program, including the initial costs of setting up the collection mechanism, may be reimbursed at the discretion of the governing body from the energy assistance moneys collected.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 481, § 1, effective May 5.

40-8.7-107. Disposition of contributions and charges.

Each utility collecting optional energy assistance contributions pursuant to section 40-8.7-104 (2) and each water utility collecting optional contributions pursuant to section 40-8.7-104.3 (1) shall transfer the money collected to the organization on the following schedule:

For the moneys collected during the period of January 1 to March 31 of each year, the utility shall transfer the collected moneys to the organization before May 1 of such year;

For the moneys collected during the period of April 1 to June 30 of each year, the utility shall transfer the collected moneys to the organization before August 1 of such year;

For moneys collected during the period of July 1 to September 30 of each year, the utility shall transfer the collected moneys to the organization before November 1 of such year; and

For moneys collected during the period of October 1 to December 31 of each year, the utility shall transfer the collected moneys to the organization before February 1 of the next year.

(1.5) (a) An investor-owned utility collecting the energy assistance system benefit charge pursuant to section 40-8.7-104 (2.5) shall transfer the money collected in accordance with the schedule established in subsection (1) of this section.

Except as provided in section 40-8.7-108 (2)(b), the organization shall use the money collected from each investor-owned utility pursuant to section 40-8.7-104 (2.5) to help finance direct utility bill payment assistance and energy retrofits provided to low-income households within that investor-owned utility's service territory or within the service territory of an affiliated investor-owned utility.

Notwithstanding section 40-3-114, a utility regulated by the public utilities commission may use funds collected from its customers for the purpose of complying with a statutory requirement to finance low-income energy assistance programs.

Each utility shall provide the organization with a summary of how the moneys collected were generated, including the number of customers participating in the program.

The organization shall pay the public utilities commission from the moneys transferred to the organization pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for any administrative costs incurred pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 482, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2021:

IP(1) amended and (1.5) added, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3502, § 11, effective September 7.

40-8.7-108. Energy outreach Colorado - administration of energy assistance contributions and the system benefit charge.

The organization shall hold and administer all money collected for energy assistance pursuant to this article 8.7 delivered to it by the utilities pursuant to section 40-8.7-107 in a separately identifiable account, which shall be restricted to the purposes set forth in this article 8.7. The organization shall maintain its books and records pertaining to the energy assistance contributions and the energy assistance system benefit charge in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and, in addition, shall maintain records adequate to identify the money collected by each utility. If the organization commingles the money collected and delivered with other assets of the organization for investment purposes, the organization shall maintain accurate accounts of the investment money and shall credit or charge a pro rata portion of all investment earnings, gains, or losses to the account that holds the optional energy assistance collections and energy assistance system benefit charges.

Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, the organization shall use the money collected from the optional energy assistance contributions and the energy assistance system benefit charge to provide low-income energy assistance and to improve energy efficiency. The organization shall pay the financial assistance money to each utility as vendor payments. The organization shall not use the money for propane, gas, or electric assistance for customers whose propane, gas, electric, or gas and electric companies or cooperative electric associations do not participate in the program. The organization may use up to five percent of the money collected for administration of the energy assistance program in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles; however, the organization shall not use any money collected from the energy assistance system benefit charge to pay employee salaries or bonuses.

In accordance with the payment amounts reflected in the organization's budget prepared pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section and approved by the legislative commission on low-income energy and water assistance pursuant to section 40-8.5-103.5 (6)(c), the organization shall transmit a portion of the money collected from the energy assistance system benefit charge to the state treasurer, and the state treasurer shall credit that amount to the supplemental utility assistance fund created in section 26-2-307 (2)(a) for use by the department of human services in accordance with section 26-2-307 (1).

Subject to the allocation requirements set forth in subsections (3)(a)(II) and (3)(a)(III) of this section, the organization shall, on an annual basis, develop a budget for the energy assistance program to determine the allocation of the money collected from the optional energy assistance contributions and the energy assistance system benefit charge, with not more than fifty percent of the total amount allocated to direct utility bill payment assistance. To improve and increase enrollment in the utility assistance programs, the budget must include an allocation of at least two percent of the money collected from the charge to be used to engage the assistance of community-based organizations that are active in outreach to, engagement of, and education for income-qualified communities, communities of color, and immigrant communities to help provide outreach and education about the utility assistance programs. The organization shall submit a copy of the budget to the Colorado energy office for its review.
(3) (a) (I) Subject to the allocation requirements set forth in subsections (3)(a)(II) and (3)(a)(III) of this section, the organization shall, on an annual basis, develop a budget for the energy assistance program to determine the allocation of the money collected from the optional energy assistance contributions and the energy assistance system benefit charge, with not more than fifty percent of the total amount allocated to direct utility bill payment assistance. To improve and increase enrollment in the utility assistance programs, the budget must include an allocation of at least two percent of the money collected from the charge to be used to engage the assistance of community-based organizations that are active in outreach to, engagement of, and education for income-qualified communities, communities of color, and immigrant communities to help provide outreach and education about the utility assistance programs. The organization shall submit a copy of the budget to the Colorado energy office for its review.

Subject to subsection (3)(a)(IV) of this section, before the organization begins allocating an amount of the money collected from the energy assistance system benefit charge to be credited to the supplemental utility assistance fund created in section 26-2-307 (2)(a), the organization, after allocating at least two percent of the money collected to community outreach as described in subsection (3)(a)(I) of this section, shall:

If the projected amount collected in the federal fiscal year, as determined by the organization by April 30, will not exceed ten million dollars, allocate forty percent to the Colorado energy office created in section 24-38.5-101 for its weatherization assistance program and retain forty-five percent for the organization's energy assistance programs, with the legislative commission on low-income energy and water assistance, referred to in this subsection (3)(a) as the "legislative commission", determining the allocation of the remaining money between the two entities pursuant to its budget approval authority under section 40-8.5-103.5 (6)(c); and

If the projected amount collected in the federal fiscal year, as determined by the organization by April 30, will exceed ten million dollars, allocate forty-five percent to the Colorado energy office for its weatherization assistance program and retain forty-five percent for the organization's energy assistance programs, with the legislative commission determining the allocation of the remaining money between the two entities pursuant to its budget approval authority.

Subject to subsection (3)(a)(IV) of this section, once the organization begins allocating an amount of the money collected from the energy assistance system benefit charge to be credited to the supplemental utility assistance fund created in section 26-2-307 (2)(a), the organization, after allocating money for the supplemental utility assistance fund and for community outreach as described in subsection (3)(a)(I) of this section, shall:

If the projected amount collected in the federal fiscal year, as determined by the organization by April 30, will not exceed ten million dollars, allocate forty percent to the Colorado energy office for its weatherization assistance program and retain forty-five percent for the organization's energy assistance programs, with the legislative commission determining the allocation of the remaining money between the two entities pursuant to its budget approval authority under section 40-8.5-103.5 (6)(c); and

If the projected amount collected in the federal fiscal year, as determined by the organization by April 30, will exceed ten million dollars, allocate forty-five percent to the Colorado energy office for its weatherization assistance program and retain forty-five percent for the organization's energy assistance programs, with the legislative commission determining the allocation of the remaining money between the two entities pursuant to its budget approval authority.

If any money allocated to the Colorado energy office or retained by the organization is not expended in the year for which it was allocated, the legislative commission may take that unexpended money into consideration in allocating money in the following year's budget pursuant to this subsection (3)(a).

As part of the budget developed pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section, the organization shall calculate the amount of money from the energy assistance system benefit charge to transmit to the state treasurer pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section and the amount of the fuel assistance payments that the department of human services makes in accordance with section 26-2-307 (1).

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 483, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3503, § 12, effective September 7.

40-8.7-108.5. Energy outreach Colorado - administration of water assistance contributions.

The organization shall hold and administer all money collected for water assistance pursuant to this article 8.7 delivered to it by water utilities pursuant to section 40-8.7-107 in a separately identifiable account, which shall be restricted to the purposes set forth in this article 8.7. The organization shall maintain its books and records pertaining to the water assistance contributions in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and, in addition, shall maintain records adequate to identify the money collected by each water utility. If the organization commingles the money collected and delivered with other assets of the organization for investment purposes, the organization shall maintain accurate accounts of the investment money and shall credit or charge a pro rata portion of all investment earnings, gains, or losses to the account that holds the water assistance collections.

The organization shall use the water assistance contributions to provide low-income water assistance. The organization shall pay the financial assistance money to each participating water utility as vendor payments. The organization shall not use the money for water assistance for customers whose water utility does not participate in the program. The organization may use up to five percent of the money collected for administration of the water assistance program in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

The organization shall, on an annual basis, develop a budget for the water assistance program to determine the allocation of the water assistance contributions collected under this article 8.7.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3505, § 13, effective September 7.

40-8.7-109. Low-income energy assistance program - eligibility.

The organization shall provide energy assistance to individuals and organizations in Colorado. Individuals eligible for low-income energy assistance shall be current or prospective utility customers who:

Are certified by the department of human services as qualified to receive financial assistance payments;

Are citizens or legal residents of the United States and residents of Colorado; and

Have a monthly household gross income at or below one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty line.

The department of human services shall periodically recertify an individual's eligibility to receive low-income energy assistance.

In providing low-income energy assistance, the organization shall give priority to households where one or more persons are recipients of:

An old age pension as set forth in section 26-2-111 (2), C.R.S.;

Aid to the needy disabled as set forth in section 26-2-111 (4), C.R.S.;

Aid to the blind as set forth in section 26-2-111 (5), C.R.S.;

Supplemental social security disability benefits under 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396 et seq.; or

Colorado works program assistance as set forth in section 26-2-706.6, C.R.S.

When installing energy retrofits as part of providing low-income energy assistance, the organization and the Colorado energy office shall prioritize maximizing customer savings, reducing emissions, and improving indoor air quality.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 483, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1801, § 23, effective July 1; (3)(e) amended, p. 1978, § 27, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2010:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2124, § 183, effective August 11.

L. 2021:

(4) added, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3506, § 14, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(e), amended by Senate Bill 08-177, was renumbered as subsection (3)(e) and harmonized with House Bill 08-1227, effective January 1, 2009.

40-8.7-110. Reports.

The organization shall submit a written report to the general assembly, the legislative audit committee, and the office of the state auditor on or before March 31 of each year covering the immediately preceding calendar year. The report must include:

An itemized account of the money received by the organization from each utility for the low-income energy assistance program, including:

The money received from customers' optional energy assistance contributions pursuant to section 40-8.7-104 (2); and

The money received from customers' monthly energy assistance system benefit charges pursuant to section 40-8.7-104 (2.5), including information regarding the money received from each investor-owned utility and the money the organization has spent in each investor-owned utility's service territory or within the service territory of an affiliated investor-owned utility;

An itemized account of the money received by the organization from each participating water utility for the organization's water assistance program pursuant to section 40-8.7-104.3;

For the low-income energy assistance program and the water assistance program:

The amount of money distributed, the type of assistance provided, the geographic area of the state served, and an itemization of the programs through which the money is expended;

The number of low-income households served, by utility or water utility and by type of assistance provided;

An audited financial statement from the organization; and

A summary of how the money collected was generated, including the number of customers participating in the program.

(1.5) To the extent applicable, the organization shall include in the report the information required by subsections (1)(b)(I) and (1)(b)(II) of this section for money received from the Colorado energy office pursuant to section 40-8.7-112 (2)(a).

The organization shall post the report on its public website so that it is available to the public for review.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the Colorado energy office shall submit a written report to the general assembly, the legislative audit committee, and the office of the state auditor on or before March 31 of each year covering the immediately preceding calendar year. The report must include an itemized account of the money that the office received from the energy assistance system benefit charge collected pursuant to section 40-8.7-104 (2.5) for use for its weatherization assistance program, including information on the amount of money distributed, the type of assistance provided, and the geographic areas of the state served. The office shall post the report on its public website.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 484, § 1, effective May 5.

L. 2006:

(1.5) added, p. 6, § 2, effective February 3.

L. 2008:

(1.5) amended, p. 1874, § 15, effective June 2.

L. 2012:

(1.5) amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 981, § 52, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(3) added, (HB 20-1412), ch. 113, p. 472, § 2, effective June 22.

L. 2021:

(1), (1.5), and (2) amended and (4) added, (HB 21-1105), ch. 488, p. 3506, § 15, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (3), effective January 1, 2022. (See L. 2020, p. 472.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 20-1412, see section 1 of chapter 113, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

40-8.7-111. Jurisdiction of the public utilities commission.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to expand or alter the jurisdiction of the public utilities commission.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 484, § 1, effective May 5.